Illinois, session 104th, SB824.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-10 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-10)  (was 20 ILCS 605/46.1 in part)8    Sec. 605-10. Powers and duties. The The Department has the 9powers and duties enumerated in the Sections following this 10Section.11(Source: P.A. 91-239, eff. 1-1-00.)